Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7528.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-12 of the General Laws entitled "Rights and Duties of Teachers
Generally" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-12-12. Districts to consult list when hiring teachers who are new to the district.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means an applicant for employment as a teacher in a certificated or
classified position who is currently or was previously employed by a school district other than the
district where the applicant is applying for employment.
(2) "Department" means the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary
education.
(3) "Employer" means a school district employer.
(b) Before hiring an applicant, a school district shall contact the department, and the
department shall disclose whether or not the applicant's name appears on a list of those teachers
who have been terminated for good and just cause, which list is maintained by the department
pursuant to § 16-13-9.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004824
========